District of Columbia statutes.
49-213

Right to own personal property; actions for injuries.

Organizations of the National Guard shall have the right to own and keep personal property, which shall belong to and be under the control of the active members thereof; and the commanding officer of any organization may recover for its use any debts or effects belonging to it, or damages for injury to such property; action for such recovery to be brought in the name of such commanding officer, before the court in the District of Columbia having jurisdiction of the amount in controversy, and no suit or complaint pending in his name shall be abated by his ceasing to be commanding officer of the organization; but, upon the motion of the commander succeeding him, such commander shall be admitted to prosecute the suit or complaint in like manner and with like effect as if it had been originally commenced by him.

History

Mar. 1, 1889, 25 Stat. 777, ch. 328, § 38
renumbered Feb. 17, 1909, 35 Stat. 623, ch. 134
Feb. 18, 1909, 35 Stat. 634, ch. 146, § 41
June 25, 1936, 49 Stat. 1921, ch. 804
June 25, 1948, 62 Stat. 991, ch. 646, § 32(b)
May 24, 1949, 63 Stat. 107, ch. 139, § 127
July 8, 1963, 77 Stat. 77, Pub. L. 88-60, § 1
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 575, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 157(i)

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 39-213.
1973 Ed., § 39-513.